California statutes. Penal Code
(1) A person who personally used a firearm during the commission or attempted commission of any of the following crimes:

(A) Murder.

(B) Robbery, in violation of Section 211.

(C) Kidnapping, in violation of Section 207, 209, or 209.5.

(D) Lewd or lascivious act, in violation of Section 288.

(E) Burglary of the first degree, as defined in Section 460.

(F) Rape, in violation of Section 261, 264.1, or former Section 262.

(G) Assault with intent to commit a specified sexual offense, in violation of Section 220.

(H) Escape, in violation of Section 4530 or 4532.

(I) Carjacking, in violation of Section 215.

(J) Aggravated mayhem, in violation of Section 205.

(K) Torture, in violation of Section 206.

(L) Continuous sexual
 abuse of a child, in violation of Section 288.5.

(M) A felony violation of Section 136.1 or 137.

(N) Sodomy, in violation of Section 286.

(O) Oral copulation, in violation of Section 287 or former Section 288a.

(P) Sexual penetration, in violation of Section 289 or 264.1.

(Q) Aggravated sexual assault of a child, in violation of Section 269.

(2) A person previously convicted of a felony specified in paragraph (1), or assault with intent to commit murder under former Section 217, who is convicted of a subsequent felony and who was personally armed with a firearm at any time during its commission or attempted commission or was
 unlawfully armed with a firearm at the time of arrest for the subsequent felony.

(3) Aggravated arson, in violation of Section 451.5.

(b) The existence of any fact that would make a person ineligible for probation under subdivision (a) shall be alleged in the accusatory pleading, and either admitted by the defendant in open court or found to be true by the trier of fact.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Armed with a firearm” means to knowingly carry or have available for use a firearm as a means of offense or defense.

(2) “Used a firearm” means to display a firearm in a menacing manner, to intentionally fire it, to intentionally strike or hit a human
 being with it, or to use it in any manner that qualifies under Section 12022.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 46.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.065.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, probation shall not be granted to, nor shall the execution or imposition of sentence be suspended for, a person who is convicted of violating paragraph (2), (3), (4), or (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 261, Section 264.1, 266h, 266i, 266j, or 269, paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (c), or subdivision (d), (f), or (i) of Section 286, paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (c), or subdivision (d), (f), or (i) of Section 287 or former Section 288a, Section 288.7, subdivision (a), (d), or (e) of Section 289, or subdivision (b) of Section
 311.4.

(b) (1) Except in unusual cases where the interests of justice would best be served if the person is granted probation, probation shall not be granted to a person who is convicted of violating paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 261, subdivision (k) of Section 286, subdivision (k) of Section 287 or former Section 288a, subdivision (g) of Section 289, or Section 220 for assault with intent to commit a specified sexual offense.

(2) If probation is granted, the court shall specify on the record and shall enter on the minutes the circumstances indicating that the interests of
 justice would best be served by the disposition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 423, Sec. 92.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Note: This section was amended on Nov. 7, 2006, by initiative Prop. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.066.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 1203 or any other law, probation shall not be granted to, nor shall the execution or imposition of sentence be suspended for, nor shall a finding bringing the defendant within the provisions of this section be stricken pursuant to Section 1385 for, any of the following persons:

(1) A person who is convicted of violating Section 288 or 288.5 when the act is committed by the use of force, violence, duress, menace, or fear of immediate and unlawful bodily injury on the victim or another person.

(2) A person who caused bodily injury on the child victim in committing a violation of Section 288 or 288.5.

(3) A
 person who is convicted of a violation of Section 288 or 288.5 and who was a stranger to the child victim or befriended the child victim for the purpose of committing an act in violation of Section 288 or 288.5, unless the defendant honestly and reasonably believed the victim was 14 years of age or older.

(4) A person who used a weapon during the commission of a violation of Section 288 or 288.5.

(5) A person who is convicted of committing a violation of Section 288 or 288.5 and who has been previously convicted of a violation of Section 261, 264.1, 266, 266c, 267, 285, 286, 287, 288, 288.5, or 289, or former Section 262 or 288a, or of assaulting another person with intent to commit a crime specified in this paragraph in violation of Section 220, or who has been previously convicted in another state of an offense which, if committed or attempted in this state, would constitute an
 offense enumerated in this paragraph.

(6) A person who violated Section 288 or 288.5 while kidnapping the child victim in violation of Section 207, 209, or 209.5.

(7) A person who is convicted of committing a violation of Section 288 or 288.5 against more than one victim.

(8) A person who, in violating Section 288 or 288.5, has substantial sexual conduct with a victim who is under 14 years of age.

(9) A person who, in violating Section 288 or 288.5, used obscene matter, as defined in Section 311, or matter, as defined in Section 311, depicting sexual conduct, as defined in Section 311.3.

(b) “Substantial sexual conduct” means penetration of the vagina or rectum of either the victim or the
 offender by the penis of the other or by any foreign object, oral copulation, or masturbation of either the victim or the offender.

(c) (1) Except for a violation of subdivision (b) of Section 288, this section shall only apply if the existence of any fact required in subdivision (a) is alleged in the accusatory pleading and is either admitted by the defendant in open court, or found to be true by the trier of fact.

(2) For the existence of any fact under paragraph (7) of subdivision (a), the allegation must be made pursuant to this section.

(d) (1) If a person is convicted of a violation of Section 288 or 288.5, and the factors listed in subdivision (a) are not pled or proven, probation may be granted only if the following terms and conditions are met:

(A) If the defendant is a member of the victim’s household, the court finds that probation is in the best interest of the child victim.

(B) The court finds that rehabilitation of the defendant is feasible and that the defendant is amenable to undergoing treatment, and the defendant is placed in a recognized treatment program designed to deal with child molestation immediately after the grant of probation or the suspension of execution or imposition of sentence.

(C) If the defendant is a member of the victim’s household, probation shall not be granted unless the defendant is removed from the household of the victim until the court determines that the best interests of the victim would be served by the defendant’s return. While removed from the household, the court shall prohibit contact by the defendant with the victim,
 with the exception that the court may permit supervised contact, upon the request of the director of the court-ordered supervised treatment program, and with the agreement of the victim and the victim’s parent or legal guardian, other than the defendant.

(D) If the defendant is not a member of the victim’s household, the court shall prohibit the defendant from being placed or residing within one-half mile of the child victim’s residence for the duration of the probation term unless the court, on the record, states its reasons for finding that this residency restriction would not serve the best interests of the victim.

(E) The court finds that there is no threat of physical harm to the victim if probation is granted.

(2) The court shall state its reasons on the record for whatever sentence it imposes on the
 defendant.

(3) The court shall order the psychiatrist or psychologist who is appointed pursuant to Section 288.1 to include a consideration of the factors specified in subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) of paragraph (1) in making the report to the court.

(4) The court shall order the defendant to comply with all probation requirements, including the requirements to attend counseling, keep all program appointments, and pay program fees based upon ability to pay.

(5) A victim shall not be compelled to participate in a program or counseling, and a program may not condition a defendant’s enrollment on participation by the victim.

(e) As used in subdivision (d), the following definitions apply:

(1) “Contact with the victim” includes all physical contact, being in the presence of the victim, communicating by any means, including by a third party acting on behalf of the defendant, or sending any gifts.

(2) “Recognized treatment program” means a program that consists of the following components:

(A) Substantial expertise in the treatment of child sexual abuse.

(B) A treatment regimen designed to specifically address the offense.

(C) The ability to serve indigent clients.

(D) Adequate reporting requirements to ensure that all persons who, after being ordered to attend and complete a program, may be identified for either failure to enroll in, or failure to successfully
 complete, the program, or for the successful completion of the program as ordered. The program shall notify the court and the probation department, in writing, within the period of time and in the manner specified by the court of any person who fails to complete the program. Notification shall be given if the program determines that the defendant is performing unsatisfactorily or if the defendant is not benefiting from the education, treatment, or counseling.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 47.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.067.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, before probation may be granted to any person convicted of a felony specified in Section 261, 264.1, 286, 287, 288, 288.5, or 289, or former Section 262 or 288a, who is eligible for probation, the court shall do all of the following:

(1) Order the defendant evaluated pursuant to Section 1203.03, or similar evaluation by the county probation department.

(2) Conduct a hearing at the time of sentencing to determine if probation of the defendant would pose a threat to the victim. The victim shall be notified of the hearing by the prosecuting attorney and given an opportunity to address the court.

(3) Order any psychiatrist or psychologist appointed pursuant to Section 288.1 to include a consideration of the threat to the victim and the defendant’s potential for positive response to treatment in making the report to the court. This section does not require the court to order an examination of the victim.

(b) The terms of probation for persons placed on formal probation for an offense that requires registration pursuant to Sections 290 to 290.023, inclusive, shall include all of the following:

(1) A person placed on formal probation prior to July 1, 2012, shall participate in an approved sex offender management program, following the standards developed pursuant to Section 9003, for a period of not less than one year or the remaining term of probation if it is less than one year. The length of the period in the program is to be determined by the certified sex
 offender management professional in consultation with the probation officer and as approved by the court. Participation in this program applies to every person described without regard to when the person’s crime or crimes were committed.

(2) A person placed on formal probation on or after July 1, 2012, shall successfully complete a sex offender management program, following the standards developed pursuant to Section 9003, as a condition of release from probation. The length of the period in the program shall be not less than one year, up to the entire period of probation, as determined by the certified sex offender management professional in consultation with the probation officer and as approved by the court. Participation in this program applies to each person without regard to when the person’s crime or crimes were committed.

(3) Waiver of any privilege against
 self-incrimination and participation in polygraph examinations, which shall be part of the sex offender management program.

(4) Waiver of any psychotherapist-patient privilege to enable communication between the sex offender management professional and supervising probation officer, pursuant to Section 290.09.

(c) A defendant ordered to be placed in an approved sex offender management program pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be responsible for paying the expense of participation in the program as determined by the court. The court shall take into consideration the ability of the defendant to pay, and a defendant shall not be denied probation because of their inability to pay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 48.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.07.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 1203 and except as provided in subdivision (c), probation shall not be granted to, nor shall the execution or imposition of sentence be suspended for, either of the following:

(1) A person who is convicted of violating Section 11380 of the Health and Safety Code by using, soliciting, inducing, encouraging, or intimidating a minor to act as an agent to manufacture, compound, or sell a controlled substance specified in subdivision (d) of Section 11054 of the Health and Safety Code, except paragraphs (13), (14), (15), (20), (21), (22), and (23) of subdivision (d), or specified in subdivision (d), (e), or (f) of Section 11055 of the
 Health and Safety Code, except paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) and subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 11055 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) A person who is convicted of violating Section 11380 of the Health and Safety Code by using a minor as an agent or who solicits, induces, encourages, or intimidates a minor with the intent that the minor shall violate the provisions of Section 11378.5, 11379.5, or 11379.6 of the Health and Safety Code insofar as the violation relates to phencyclidine or any of its analogs or precursors.

(b) The existence of a fact that would make a person ineligible for probation under subdivision (a) shall be alleged in the information or indictment, and either admitted by the defendant in open court, or found to be
 true by the jury trying the issue of guilt or by the court where guilt is established by plea of guilty or nolo contendere or by trial by the court sitting without a jury.

(c) A person who is made ineligible for probation pursuant to this section may be granted probation only in an unusual case where the interests of justice would best be served. When probation is granted pursuant to this subdivision, the court shall specify on the record and shall enter into the minutes the circumstances supporting the finding.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 537, Sec. 3.   (SB 73)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.074.

(a) A person convicted of a felony specified in subdivision (b) may be granted probation only in an unusual case where the interests of justice would best be served; when probation is granted in such a case, the court shall specify on the record and shall enter in the minutes the circumstances indicating that the interests of justice would best be served by such a disposition.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (a), probation shall not be granted to, nor shall the execution or imposition of sentence be suspended for, any person who is convicted of violating Section 11366.6 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1533, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.075.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, probation shall not be granted to, nor shall the execution or imposition of sentence be suspended for, nor shall a finding bringing the defendant within this section be stricken pursuant to Section 1385 for, any person who personally inflicts great bodily injury, as defined in Section 12022.7, on the person of another in the commission or attempted commission of any of the following crimes:

(1) Murder.

(2) Robbery, in violation of Section 211.

(3) Kidnapping, in violation of Section 207, 209, or 209.5.

(4) Lewd or lascivious act, in
 violation of Section 288.

(5) Burglary of the first degree, as defined in Section 460.

(6) Rape, in violation of Section 261, 264.1, or former Section 262.

(7) Assault with intent to commit a specified sexual offense, in violation of Section 220.

(8) Escape, in violation of Section 4530 or 4532.

(9) Sexual penetration, in violation of Section 289 or 264.1.

(10) Sodomy, in violation of Section 286.

(11) Oral copulation, in violation of Section 287 or former Section 288a.

(12) Carjacking, in
 violation of Section 215.

(13) Continuous sexual abuse of a child, in violation of Section 288.5.

(14) Aggravated sexual assault of a child, in violation of Section 269.

(b) The existence of any fact that would make a person ineligible for probation under subdivision (a) shall be alleged in the accusatory pleading, and either admitted by the defendant in open court, or found to be true by the trier of fact.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 49.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.076.

A person convicted of violating Section 11352 of the Health and Safety Code relating to the sale of cocaine, cocaine hydrochloride, or heroin, or Section 11379.5 of the Health and Safety Code, who is eligible for probation and who is granted probation may, as a condition thereof, be confined in the county jail for at least 180 days. The imposition of the minimum 180-day sentence
 may be imposed in every case in which probation has been granted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 574, Sec. 1.   (AB 484)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.08.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, probation shall not be granted to, nor shall the execution or imposition of sentence be suspended for, an adult person convicted of a designated felony who has been previously convicted as an adult under charges separately brought and tried two or more times of any designated felony or in any other place of a public offense which, if committed in this state, would have been punishable as a designated felony, if all the convictions occurred within a 10-year period. The 10-year period shall be calculated exclusive of any period of time during which the person has been confined in a state or federal prison.

(b) (1) The existence of any fact that would make a person
 ineligible for probation under subdivision (a) shall be alleged in the information or indictment, and either admitted by the defendant in open court, or found to be true by the jury trying the issue of guilt or by the court where guilt is established by plea of guilty or nolo contendere or by trial by the court sitting without a jury.

(2) Except where the existence of the fact was not admitted or found to be true pursuant to paragraph (1), or the court finds that a prior conviction was invalid, the court shall not strike or dismiss any prior convictions alleged in the information or indictment.

(3) This subdivision does not prohibit the adjournment of criminal proceedings pursuant to Division 3 (commencing with Section 3000) or Division 6 (commencing with Section 6000) of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(c) As
 used in this section, “designated felony” means any felony specified in Section 187, 192, 207, 209, 209.5, 211, 215, 217, 245, 288, or paragraph (2), (6), or (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 261, paragraph (1), (4), or (5) of subdivision (a) of former Section 262, subdivision (a) of Section 460, or when great bodily injury occurs in perpetration of an assault to commit robbery, mayhem, or rape, as defined in Section 220.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 50.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.085.

(a) Any person convicted of an offense punishable by imprisonment in the state prison but without an alternate sentence to a county jail shall not be granted probation or have the execution or imposition of sentence suspended, if the offense was committed while the person was on parole from state prison pursuant to Section 3000, following a term of imprisonment imposed for a violent felony, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5, or a serious felony, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7.

(b) Any person convicted of a violent felony, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5, or a serious felony, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7, shall not be granted probation or have the execution or imposition of sentence suspended, if the offense was committed while the person was on parole from state prison pursuant to Section 3000.

(c) The existence of any fact that would make a person ineligible for probation under subdivision (a) or (b) shall be alleged in the information or indictment, and either admitted by the defendant in open court, or found to be true by the jury trying the issue of guilt or by the court where guilt is established by plea of guilty or nolo contendere or by trial by the court sitting without a jury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 160, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.09.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, probation shall not be granted to, nor shall the execution or imposition of sentence be suspended for, a person who commits or attempts to commit one or more of the crimes listed in subdivision (b) against a person who is 60 years of age or older; or against a person who is blind, a paraplegic, a quadriplegic, or a person confined to a wheelchair and that disability is known or reasonably should be known to the person committing the crime; and who during the course of the offense inflicts great bodily injury upon the person.

(b) Subdivision (a) applies to the following crimes:

(1) Murder.

(2) Robbery, in violation of Section 211.

(3) Kidnapping, in violation of Section 207.

(4) Kidnapping, in violation of Section 209.

(5) Burglary of the first degree, as defined in Section 460.

(6) Rape by force or violence, in violation of paragraph (2) or (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 261 or paragraph (1) or (4) of subdivision (a) of former Section 262.

(7) Assault with intent to commit rape or sodomy, in violation of Section 220.

(8) Carjacking, in violation of Section 215.

(9) Kidnapping, in
 violation of Section 209.5.

(c) The existence of any fact that would make a person ineligible for probation under either subdivision (a) or (f) shall be alleged in the information or indictment, and either admitted by the defendant in open court, or found to be true by the jury trying the issue of guilt or by the court where guilt is established by plea of guilty or nolo contendere or by trial by the court sitting without a jury.

(d) As used in this section, “great bodily injury” has the same meaning as defined in Section 12022.7.

(e) This section shall apply in all cases, including those cases where the infliction of great bodily injury is an element of the offense.

(f) Except in unusual cases where the interests of justice would best be served if the
 person is granted probation, probation shall not be granted to, nor shall the execution or imposition of sentence be suspended for, a person convicted of having committed one or more of the following crimes against a person who is 60 years of age or older: assault with a deadly weapon or instrument, battery that results in physical injury that requires professional medical treatment, carjacking, robbery, or mayhem.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 51.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.095.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), but notwithstanding any other provision of law, if any person convicted of a violation of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 245, of a violation of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 245, of a violation of Section 246, or a violation of subdivision (c) of Section 417, is granted probation or the execution or imposition of sentence is suspended, it shall be a condition thereof that he or she be imprisoned for at least six months, and if any person convicted of a violation of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 417 is granted probation or the execution or imposition of sentence is suspended, it shall be a condition thereof that he or she be imprisoned for at least three months.

(b) The provisions of subdivision (a) shall apply except in unusual cases where the interests of justice would best be served by granting probation or suspending the imposition or execution of sentence without the imprisonment required by subdivision (a), or by granting probation or suspending the imposition or execution of sentence with conditions other than those set forth in subdivision (a), in which case the court shall specify on the record and shall enter on the minutes the circumstances indicating that the interests of justice would best be served by such a disposition.

(c) This section does not prohibit the adjournment of criminal proceedings pursuant to Division 3 (commencing with Section 3000) or Division 6 (commencing with Section 6000) of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 377, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.096.

(a) Upon conviction of any felony in which the defendant is sentenced to state prison and in which the court makes the findings set forth in subdivision (b), a court shall, in addition to any other terms of imprisonment, fine, and conditions, recommend in writing that the defendant participate in a counseling or education program having a substance abuse component while imprisoned. 

(b) The court shall make the recommendation specified in subdivision (a) if it finds that any of the following are true: 

(1) That the defendant at the time of the commission of the offense was under the influence of any alcoholic beverages. 

(2) That the defendant at the time of the commission of the offense was under the influence of any controlled substance. 

(3) That the defendant has a demonstrated history of substance abuse. 

(4) That the offense or offenses for which the defendant was convicted are drug related.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 552, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.097.

(a) If a person is granted probation for a crime in which the victim is a person defined in Section 6211 of the Family Code, the terms of probation shall include all of the following:

(1) A minimum period of probation of 36 months, which may include a period of summary probation as appropriate.

(2) A criminal court protective order protecting the victim from further acts of violence, threats, stalking, sexual abuse, and harassment, and, if appropriate, containing residence exclusion or stay-away conditions. It is the intent of the Legislature that the length of any restraining order be based upon the seriousness of the
 facts before the court, the probability of future violations, the safety of the victim and their immediate family, and the information provided to the court pursuant to Section 273.75.

(3) Notice to the victim of the disposition of the case.

(4) Booking the defendant within one week of sentencing if the defendant has not already been booked.

(5) (A) A minimum payment by the defendant of a fee of five hundred dollars ($500) to be disbursed as specified in this paragraph. If, after a hearing in open court, the court finds that the defendant does not have the ability to pay, the court may reduce or waive this fee. If the court exercises its discretion to reduce or waive the fee, it shall state the reason on the
 record.

(B) Two-thirds of the moneys deposited with the county treasurer pursuant to this section shall be retained by counties and deposited in the domestic violence programs special fund created pursuant to Section 18305 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, to be expended for the purposes of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 18290) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Of the moneys deposited in the domestic violence programs special fund, no more than 8 percent may be used for administrative costs, as specified in Section 18305 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(C) The remaining one-third of the moneys shall be transferred, once a month, to the Controller for deposit in equal amounts in the Domestic Violence Restraining Order Reimbursement Fund and
 in the Domestic Violence Training and Education Fund, which are hereby created, in an amount equal to one-third of funds collected during the preceding month. Moneys deposited into these funds pursuant to this section shall be available upon appropriation by the Legislature and shall be distributed each fiscal year as follows:

(i) Funds from the Domestic Violence Restraining Order Reimbursement Fund shall be distributed to local law enforcement or other criminal justice agencies for state-mandated local costs resulting from the notification requirements set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 6380 of the Family Code, based on the annual notification from the Department of Justice of the number of restraining orders issued and registered in the state domestic violence restraining order registry maintained by the Department of Justice,
 for the development and maintenance of the domestic violence restraining order databank system.

(ii) Funds from the Domestic Violence Training and Education Fund shall support a statewide training and education program to increase public awareness of domestic violence and to improve the scope and quality of services provided to the victims of domestic violence. Grants to support this program shall be awarded on a competitive basis and be administered by the State Department of Public Health, in consultation with the statewide domestic violence coalition, which is eligible to receive funding under this section.

(D) The fee imposed by this paragraph shall be treated as a fee, not as a fine, and shall not be subject to reduction for time served as provided pursuant to Section 1205 or
 2900.5.

(E) The fee imposed by this paragraph may be collected by the collecting agency, or the agency’s designee, after the termination of the period of probation, whether probation is terminated by revocation or by completion of the term.

(6) Successful completion of a batterer’s program, as defined in subdivision (c), or if none is available, another appropriate counseling program designated by the court, for a period not less than one year with periodic progress reports by the program to the court every three months or less and weekly sessions of a minimum of two hours class time duration. The defendant shall attend consecutive weekly sessions, unless granted an excused absence for good cause by the program for no more than three individual sessions during the entire
 program, and shall complete the program within 18 months, unless, after a hearing, the court finds good cause to modify the requirements of consecutive attendance or completion within 18 months.

(7) (A) (i) The court shall order the defendant to comply with all probation requirements, including the requirements to attend counseling, keep all program appointments, and pay program fees based upon the ability to pay.

(ii) The terms of probation for offenders shall not be lifted until all reasonable fees due to the counseling program have been paid in full, but in no case shall probation be extended beyond the term provided in subdivision (a) of Section 1203.1. If the court finds that the defendant does not have the ability to pay the fees
 based on the defendant’s changed circumstances, the court may reduce or waive the fees.

(B) Upon request by the batterer’s program, the court shall provide the defendant’s arrest report, prior incidents of violence, and treatment history to the program.

(8) The court also shall order the defendant to perform a specified amount of appropriate community service, as designated by the court. The defendant shall present the court with proof of completion of community service and the court shall determine if the community service has been satisfactorily completed. If sufficient staff and resources are available, the community service shall be performed under the jurisdiction of the local agency overseeing a community service program.

(9) If the program finds that the defendant is unsuitable, the program shall immediately contact the probation department or the court. The probation department or court shall either recalendar the case for hearing or refer the defendant to an appropriate alternative batterer’s program.

(10) (A) Upon recommendation of the program, a court shall require a defendant to participate in additional sessions throughout the probationary period, unless it finds that it is not in the interests of justice to do so, states its reasons on the record, and enters them into the minutes. In deciding whether the defendant would benefit from more sessions, the court shall consider whether any of the following conditions exists:

(i) The defendant has been violence free
 for a minimum of six months.

(ii) The defendant has cooperated and participated in the batterer’s program.

(iii) The defendant demonstrates an understanding of and practices positive conflict resolution skills.

(iv) The defendant blames, degrades, or has committed acts that dehumanize the victim or puts at risk the victim’s safety, including, but not limited to, molesting, stalking, striking, attacking, threatening, sexually assaulting, or battering the victim.

(v) The defendant demonstrates an understanding that the use of coercion or violent behavior to maintain dominance is unacceptable in an intimate relationship.

(vi) The defendant has made threats to harm anyone in any manner.

(vii) The defendant has complied with applicable requirements under paragraph (6) of subdivision (c) or subparagraph (C) to receive alcohol counseling, drug counseling, or both.

(viii) The defendant demonstrates acceptance of responsibility for the abusive behavior perpetrated against the victim.

(B) The program shall immediately report any violation of the terms of the protective order, including any new acts of violence or failure to comply with the program requirements, to the court, the prosecutor, and, if formal probation has been ordered, to the probation department. The probationer shall file
 proof of enrollment in a batterer’s program with the court within 30 days of conviction.

(C) Concurrent with other requirements under this section, in addition to, and not in lieu of, the batterer’s program, and unless prohibited by the referring court, the probation department or the court may make provisions for a defendant to use their resources to enroll in a chemical dependency program or to enter voluntarily a licensed chemical dependency recovery hospital or residential treatment program that has a valid license issued by the state to provide alcohol or drug services to receive program participation credit, as determined by the court. The probation department shall document evidence of this hospital or residential treatment participation in the defendant’s program file.

(11) The
 conditions of probation may include, in lieu of a fine, but not in lieu of the fund payment required under paragraph (5), one or more of the following requirements:

(A) That the defendant make payments to a domestic violence shelter-based program, up to a maximum of five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(B) That the defendant reimburse the victim for reasonable expenses that the court finds are the direct result of the defendant’s offense.

For any order to pay a fine, to make payments to a domestic violence shelter-based program, or to pay restitution as a condition of probation under this subdivision, the court shall make a determination of the defendant’s ability to pay. Determination of a defendant’s ability to pay may include their
 future earning capacity. A defendant shall bear the burden of demonstrating lack of their ability to pay. Express findings by the court as to the factors bearing on the amount of the fine shall not be required. In no event shall any order to make payments to a domestic violence shelter-based program be made if it would impair the ability of the defendant to pay direct restitution to the victim or court-ordered child support. When the injury to a married person is caused, in whole or in part, by the criminal acts of their spouse in violation of this section, the community property shall not be used to discharge the liability of the offending spouse for restitution to the injured spouse, as required by Section 1203.04, as operative on or before August 2, 1995, or Section 1202.4, or to a shelter for costs with regard to the injured spouse, until all separate property of the offending spouse is exhausted.

(12) If it appears to the prosecuting attorney, the court, or the probation department that the defendant is performing unsatisfactorily in the assigned program, is not benefiting from counseling, or has engaged in criminal conduct, upon request of the probation officer, the prosecuting attorney, or on its own motion, the court, as a priority calendar item, shall hold a hearing to determine whether further sentencing should proceed. The court may consider factors, including, but not limited to, any violence by the defendant against the former or a new victim while on probation and noncompliance with any other specific condition of probation. If the court finds that the defendant is not performing satisfactorily in the assigned program, is not benefiting from the program, has not complied with a condition of probation, or has engaged in
 criminal conduct, the court shall terminate the defendant’s participation in the program and shall proceed with further sentencing.

(b) If a person is granted formal probation for a crime in which the victim is a person defined in Section 6211 of the Family Code, in addition to the terms specified in subdivision (a), all of the following shall apply:

(1) The probation department shall make an investigation and take into consideration the defendant’s age, medical history, employment and service records, educational background, community and family ties, prior incidents of violence, police report, treatment history, if any, demonstrable motivation, and other mitigating factors in determining which batterer’s program would be appropriate for the defendant. This information